Illinois, session 104th, HB67.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Common Interest Community Association Act 5is amended by adding Section 1-73 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 160/1-73 new)7    Sec. 1-73. Law enforcement and firefighter vehicles. An 8association may not define or designate a marked law 9enforcement vehicle that is assigned to a law enforcement 10officer, as defined in Section 10-10 of the Law Enforcement 11Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, or a marked firefighter vehicle 12that is assigned to a firefighter, as defined in the Illinois 13Municipal Code, as a commercial vehicle and subject it to a 14restrictive provision in an association instrument, covenant, 15rule, or regulation, as long as the vehicle does not exceed 1612,000 pounds. Such a provision violates this Act and is void 17and unenforceable.  18    Section 10. The Condominium Property Act is amended by 19adding Section 18.14 as follows: 20    (765 ILCS 605/18.14 new)21    Sec. 18.14. Law enforcement and firefighter vehicles. An   HB0067 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02905 LNS 12915 b1association may not define or designate a marked law 2enforcement vehicle that is assigned to a law enforcement 3officer, as defined in Section 10-10 of the Law Enforcement 4Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, or a marked firefighter vehicle 5that is assigned to a firefighter, as defined in the Illinois 6Municipal Code, as a commercial vehicle and subject it to a 7restrictive provision in an association instrument, covenant, 8rule, or regulation, as long as the vehicle does not exceed 912,000 pounds. Such a provision violates this Act and is void 10and unenforceable.